Nevada, session 83, AB238.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Sections 1 to 16, inclusive, of this act may be cited
as the Nevada Studio Infrastructure Jobs and Workforce Training
Act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) The Las Vegas Metropolitan Area is the largest metropolitan
area in this State and has a site available to be developed to create
large-scale facilities for the location of companies that produce
motion pictures, television programs and other qualified productions
in this State. The establishment of such a studio campus will create
jobs in Nevada’s creative industries and diversify the economy of
this State.
(b) The Las Vegas Metropolitan Area possesses unique
geographic, economic and resource advantages that make it
especially suitable for a project of this magnitude. Because of these
unique local conditions, it is necessary to enact a law of local and
special application to promote and secure the benefits of a large-
scale film and media production development in Southern Nevada
for the benefit of the entire State.
(c) Because of these special characteristics and circumstances in
Southern Nevada, a general law cannot be made applicable to
achieve the purposes of this Act and a law of local and special
application is necessary to promote and secure the advantages of the
local and special characteristics and circumstances within the Las
Vegas Metropolitan Area.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 5 –
2. The Legislature further finds and declares that the content
production industry has presented an ambitious and visionary plan
for all of Southern Nevada, which leverages the region’s unique
geographic assets, economic capabilities and infrastructural
advantages. The industry’s vision will promote the generation of
thousands of high-quality, high-paying jobs, billions of dollars in
incremental capital investments and billions more in new economic
output and ongoing spending. This plan transcends the development
of a mere studio complex, proposing instead a dynamic production
campus that is intended to serve as the nucleus for a robust,
sustainable industrial cluster. The Legislature recognizes that
realizing this vision depends fundamentally upon a collaborative
public-private partnership, wherein the State’s commitment,
provided through transferable tax credits, creates leverage that
significantly multiplies the benefits accruing to this State. In
entering this partnership, the Legislature affirms its clear and
unwavering expectation that if the industry benefits from the State’s
contribution of transferable tax credits, the industry’s promises will
be fulfilled, the outcomes articulated by the industry will be met or
exceeded, and the anticipated economic, fiscal and social benefits
driven by the industry will be fully realized.
3. The Legislature further finds and declares that the enactment
of this Act will achieve a bona fide public social and economic
purpose. The public investment made through the film infrastructure
transferable tax credits is intended to yield substantial benefits in
employment, workforce development and economic growth, and the
overall economic benefits expected to accrue from incremental
investment and the ongoing operations of the project will exceed
any adverse effect on public revenues from those tax incentives.
This Act, therefore, serves the public interest by fostering significant
new private investment, creating enduring jobs and educational
opportunities, and positioning Nevada as a leader in the content
creation industry while ensuring that the long-term gains to the
economy more than outweigh the State’s investment in the project.
Sec. 2.5. It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this Act,
to:
1. Promote the diversification of the economy of this State by
cultivating a thriving hub for content creation and production in
Nevada, which will establish Nevada as a nationally recognized
center for film, television and digital media production, thereby
broadening Nevada’s economic base beyond its traditional
industries and enhancing the State’s prominence in the creative
economy.
2. Provide an anchor for a new creative sector in Southern
Nevada through partnerships with global film and media companies
-
*AB238_R1*

– 6 –
to develop and operate facilities for the production of film,
television and digital media productions and the involvement of
studio partners as anchor tenants to bring world-class expertise,
innovative technologies and global market access that will
accelerate the growth of a robust content creation industry in
Southern Nevada.
3. Support and promote workforce development in this State by
establishing and supporting education and vocational training
programs to prepare Nevada’s workforce for high-wage careers in
film, television and digital media production, equip Nevada’s
residents with in-demand skills and create pathways into the
industry, thereby generating thousands of new jobs for Nevadans
and building a skilled talent pool that sustains the State’s creative
sector for the long term.
Sec. 3. As used in sections 1 to 16, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in NRS 360.7581 to 360.7586, inclusive, as amended by sections 17
and 18 of this act, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections, and the words and terms defined in sections 4 to 8,
inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 4. “Capital investment” means all costs and expenses
incurred by the participants in the Project only in connection with
the acquisition of the land for the Project and the acquisition,
construction, installation and equipping of the facilities, buildings,
structures and other infrastructure at the Project for the production
of qualified productions at the Project.
Sec. 5. “Lead participant” means the person designated by the
participants in the Project as the lead participant for the Project.
Sec. 6. “Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio” means a
facility to provide vocational training and education for the
development of a trained workforce for the production in this State
of qualified productions that are film and television productions,
which is constructed by the Summerlin Production Studios Project
pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
section 9 of this act.
Sec. 7. “Office” means the Office of Economic Development
within the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 8. “Summerlin Production Studios Project” or “Project”
means a project for the construction of a development consisting of
facilities, buildings, structures and other infrastructure for the
production of qualified productions at the site of real property
burdened by the following development agreements and owned by
the master developer under such development agreements or such
master developer’s affiliated entities:
-
*AB238_R1*

– 7 –
1. Development agreement between Clark County and Howard
Hughes Properties, Limited Partnership dated February 7, 1996, as
amended, and recorded on September 4, 1996, in Book 960904 as
Instrument No. 01725 and re-recorded on September 10, 1996, in
Book 960910 as Instrument No. 01379 in the official records of the
Clark County, Nevada Recorder’s Office.
2. Development agreement between the City of Las Vegas and
Howard Hughes Properties, Limited Partnership, recorded on
November 21, 1997, in Book 971121 as Instrument No. 00839, as
amended, in the official records of the Clark County, Nevada
Recorder’s Office.
Sec. 9. 1. Not later than 120 days after the effective date of
this act, the Office shall enter into a development agreement with
the lead participant of the Summerlin Production Studios Project,
unless the Office agrees to extend this period by not more than 60
days. The development agreement entered into pursuant to this
section:
(a) Must require the Project to:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 6, not
later than:
(I) June 30, 2028, complete construction of a
development consisting of facilities, buildings, structures and other
infrastructure, excluding any hotel, for the production of qualified
productions at the site of the Project, which must consist of a new
capital investment in this State of at least $400,000,000.
(II) December 31, 2029, complete construction of
facilities, buildings, structures and other infrastructure at the site of
the Project, which must consist of an aggregate new capital
investment in this State, including the capital investment described
in sub-subparagraph (I), of at least $900,000,000. For the purposes
of determining the amount of new capital investment pursuant to
this sub-subparagraph, any new capital investment by a third party
who purchases property or enters into a ground lease for property
within the site of the Project must be credited toward meeting the
requirement of this sub-subparagraph. The Office shall credit toward
meeting the requirement of this sub-subparagraph 50 percent of the
new capital investment made at the Downtown Summerlin site
during the period beginning on the date of the execution of the
development agreement and ending on December 31, 2029, if the
new capital investment is consistent with the State Plan for
Economic Development developed by the Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
231.053 and the intent of the Legislature as expressed in sections 2
and 2.5 of this act.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 8 –
(III) December 31, 2032, complete construction of
facilities, buildings, structures and other infrastructure at the site of
the Project, which must consist of an aggregate new capital
investment in this State, including the capital investment described
in sub-subparagraphs (I) and (II), of at least $1,400,000,000. For the
purposes of determining the amount of new capital investment
pursuant to this sub-subparagraph, any new capital investment by a
third party who purchases property or enters into a ground lease for
property within the site of the Project must be credited toward
meeting the requirement of this sub-subparagraph. The Office shall
credit toward meeting the requirement of this sub-subparagraph 50
percent of the new capital investment made at the Downtown
Summerlin site during the period beginning on the date of the
execution of the development agreement and ending on
December 31, 2032, if the new capital investment is consistent with
the State Plan for Economic Development developed by the
Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053 and the intent of the
Legislature as expressed in sections 2 and 2.5 of this act.
(IV) December 31, 2038, complete construction of
facilities, buildings, structures and other infrastructure at the site of
the Project, which must consist of an aggregate new capital
investment in this State, including the capital investment described
in sub-subparagraphs (I), (II) and (III), of at least $1,800,000,000.
For the purposes of determining the amount of new capital
investment pursuant to this sub-subparagraph, any new capital
investment by a third party who purchases property or enters into a
ground lease for property within the site of the Project must be
credited toward meeting the requirement of this sub-subparagraph.
The Office shall credit toward meeting the requirement of this sub-
subparagraph 50 percent of the new capital investment made at the
Downtown Summerlin site during the period beginning on the date
of the execution of the development agreement and ending on
December 31, 2038, if the new capital investment is consistent with
the State Plan for Economic Development developed by the
Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053 and the finding and intent
of the Legislature as expressed in sections 2 and 2.5 of this act.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, complete
construction of the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio,
which must:
(I) Be a facility to provide vocational training and
education for the development of a trained workforce for the
production in this State of qualified productions that are film and
television productions;
-
*AB238_R1*

– 9 –
(II) Consist of a new capital investment in this State of at
least $8,000,000; and
(III) Be located at a site owned by Nevada Partners, Inc.,
or its successor organization, by June 30, 2030, or, if the lead
participant has found a site owned by Nevada Partners, Inc. to be
inviable or Nevada Partners, Inc. ceases to exist and has no
successor organization, at a site approved by the Southern Nevada
Enterprise Community Board, by June 30, 2031.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (4) and
subsections 2 and 6, guarantee that for the period beginning on:
(I) July 1, 2028, and ending on June 30, 2034, the Project
will generate, for each 2-year rolling period during that time, not
less than $600,000,000 of qualified direct production expenditures
through the production of qualified productions, in whole or in part,
at the site of the Project.
(II) July 1, 2034, and ending on June 30, 2043, the Project
will generate, for each 3-year rolling period during that time, not
less than $900,000,000 of qualified direct production expenditures
through the production of qualified productions, in whole or in part,
at the site of the Project.
(4) Require that if, during any fiscal year described in
subparagraph (3), the amount of qualified direct production
expenditures generated through the production of qualified
productions, in whole or in part, at the site of the Project exceeds
$300,000,000, the amount in excess of $300,000,000, but not to
exceed $200,000,000, must be carried forward and used to offset
any shortage in satisfying any requirement set forth in subparagraph
(3) in a subsequent fiscal year.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, not later
than 5 years after the Office and the lead participant execute the
development agreement, make a contribution of at least $6,000,000
to Clark County to support the arts, cultural programs and training
for small businesses related to the production of qualified
productions that are film or television productions.
(6) Provide written notice to the Office within 30 days after
the applicable deadline for completing a requirement set forth in
subparagraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, which must state whether the
requirement has been met. Upon receipt of the written notice, the
Office shall make a final determination of whether the requirement
has been met. If the Office determines that the requirement has been
met, the Office shall establish the date on which the requirement
was met.
(b) Must establish the minimum amount of square feet of
building space at the Project to be used for the various components
of the production of qualified productions.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 10 –
(c) Must establish the minimum number of acres of real property
that will be a part of the Project.
(d) May include such other provisions, not inconsistent with
law, concerning the development of the Project and the issuance of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to sections 3 to
16, inclusive, of this act, as agreed to by the Office and the lead
participant.
2. As the Executive Director of the Office deems necessary or
advisable, the Executive Director may modify any requirement set
forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 by extending the date by
which the capital investment, construction or contribution set forth
in those provisions must be made or completed, as applicable.
3. If the Office determines that the Project has not met a
requirement for capital investment included in the development
agreement pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, the Project may cure the deficiency by making a new
capital investment, not later than 2 years after the end of the period
for which the requirement for capital investment was not met, in an
amount necessary to satisfy the requirement for capital investment
that was not met. If the deficiency is not cured within that cure
period, the Office must impose a penalty on the Project, and record
a lien on undeveloped land within the Project, to secure payment of
such penalty, except that the amount of the penalty and lien must not
exceed 100 percent of the appraised value of the remaining
undeveloped land within the Project. A lien may not be recorded on
any completed portion of the Project and has priority over all other
liens other than liens for taxes and any lien securing a construction
loan. Any penalty, and the lien securing the payment of such
penalty, must be discharged as follows:
(a) If the requirement for capital investment which was not met
is satisfied not later than 1 year after the expiration of the cure
period, 90 percent of the amount of the penalty, and the lien
securing the payment of the penalty, must be discharged.
(b) If the requirement for capital investment which was not met
is satisfied more than 1 year, but not later than 2 years, after the
expiration of the cure period, 70 percent of the amount of the
penalty, and the lien securing the payment of the penalty, must be
discharged.
(c) If the requirement for capital investment which was not met
is satisfied more than 2 years, but not later than 3 years, after the
expiration of the cure period, 50 percent of the amount of the
penalty, and the lien securing the payment of the penalty, must be
discharged.
(d) If the requirement for capital investment which was not met
is satisfied more than 3 years, but not later than 4 years, after the
-
*AB238_R1*

– 11 –
expiration of the cure period, 30 percent of the amount of the
penalty, and the lien securing the payment of the penalty, must be
discharged.
(e) If the requirement for capital investment which was not met
is satisfied more than 4 years, but not later than 5 years, after the
expiration of the cure period, 10 percent of the amount of the
penalty, and the lien securing the payment of the penalty, must be
discharged.
4. If the Office determines that the qualified direct production
expenditures generated through the production of qualified
productions, in whole or in part, at the site of the Project is less than
$150,000,000 in any fiscal year, the Project must pay to the Office a
penalty in an amount equal to the lesser of $10,000,000 or the
amount determined by:
(a) Calculating 50 percent of the sum of the film infrastructure
transferable tax credits authorized for approval pursuant to section
13 of this act for that fiscal year and the immediately preceding
fiscal year;
(b) Calculating a percentage by dividing the difference between
the amount of qualified direct production expenditures guaranteed
for that fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 and the actual amount, as determined by the Office, of
qualified direct production expenditures generated through the
production of qualified productions, in whole or in part, at the site of
the Project, by $150,000,000; and
(c) Multiplying the percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph
(b) by the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (a).
 Any penalty paid pursuant to this subsection must be applied to
reduce the amount of any penalty imposed pursuant to subsection 5.
5. If the Office determines that the Project has not met a
requirement for qualified direct production expenditures included in
the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, the Project must pay to the Office a
penalty in an amount determined as follows:
(a) If the actual amount of qualified direct production
expenditures is not more than 5 percent less than the applicable
requirement for qualified direct production expenditures included in
the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the amount of
$2,000,000.
(b) If the actual amount of qualified direct production
expenditures is more than 5 percent and not more than 10 percent
less than the applicable requirement for qualified direct production
expenditures included in the development agreement pursuant to
-
*AB238_R1*

– 12 –
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the
amount of $5,000,000.
(c) If the actual amount of qualified direct production
expenditures is more than 10 percent and not more than 20 percent
less than the applicable requirement for qualified direct production
expenditures included in the development agreement pursuant to
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the
amount of $10,000,000.
(d) If the actual amount of qualified direct production
expenditures is more than 20 percent and not more than 30 percent
less than the applicable requirement for qualified direct production
expenditures included in the development agreement pursuant to
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the
amount of $20,000,000.
(e) If the actual amount of qualified direct production
expenditures is more than 30 percent and not more than 40 percent
less than the applicable requirement for qualified direct production
expenditures included in the development agreement pursuant to
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the
amount of $30,000,000.
(f) If the actual amount of qualified direct production
expenditures is more than 40 percent and not more than 50 percent
less than the applicable requirement for qualified direct production
expenditures included in the development agreement pursuant to
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the
amount of $40,000,000.
(g) If the actual amount of qualified direct production
expenditures is more than 50 percent less than the applicable
requirement for qualified direct production expenditures included in
the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the amount of
$50,000,000.
6. The Office may reduce, or waive, any penalty imposed
pursuant to subsection 3, 4 or 5 if, upon written request of the lead
participant, the Office determines that the failure to meet a
requirement for which a penalty may be imposed was caused by
extraordinary circumstances beyond the control of the Project and
reasonable, documented and good-faith efforts were made to satisfy
the requirement. For the purposes of this subsection, “extraordinary
circumstances”:
(a) Means natural disasters, labor strikes, significant disruptions
in material supply chains, substantial economic or geopolitical
shocks, government-mandated closures or other events in the nature
of force majeure that materially impair the ability to carry out
development and construction activities.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 13 –
(b) Does not include ordinary market fluctuations, internal
project scheduling decisions or changes in business strategy.
7. Any penalty paid to the Office pursuant to subsection 3, 4 or
5 must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the State
General Fund.
8. The Office shall not approve any abatement, partial
abatement or exemption from taxes, or any other incentive for
economic development, other than film infrastructure transferable
tax credits pursuant to sections 3 to 16, inclusive, of this act or
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.758
to 360.7598, inclusive, for the Summerlin Production Studios
Project if the Project has entered into a development agreement with
the Office pursuant to this section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Hotel” means a building occupied or intended to be
occupied for compensation, as the temporary residence for transient
guests, primarily persons who have residence elsewhere. A hotel has
an interior hall and lobby with access to each room from the interior
hall or lobby.
(b) “Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board” means the
Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board created by section 8
of the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Infrastructure
Improvement Act.
Sec. 10. 1. A production company that is located at the
Summerlin Production Studios Project and that produces, in whole
or in part, a qualified production at the Project may, on or after
June 1, 2026, apply to the Office for a certificate of eligibility for
film infrastructure transferable tax credits for any qualified direct
production expenditures. The film infrastructure transferable tax
credits may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapter 363A or 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fee imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. Except as otherwise provided in section 13 of this act, the
Office shall approve an application for a certificate of eligibility for
film infrastructure transferable tax credits if the Office finds that the
production company is producing the qualified production, in whole
or in part, at the Summerlin Production Studios Project and the
production company qualifies for the film infrastructure transferable
tax credits pursuant to subsection 3. If the Office approves the
application, the Office shall:
-
*AB238_R1*

– 14 –
(a) Calculate the estimated amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits that may be issued for the qualified
production pursuant to sections 11, 12 and 13 of this act; and
(b) Immediately forward a copy of the certificate of eligibility
which identifies the estimated amount of tax credits to:
(1) The applicant;
(2) The lead participant;
(3) The Department of Taxation; and
(4) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
3. To be eligible for film infrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section, the production company must:
(a) Before the beginning of principal photography, submit to the
Office an application for a certificate of eligibility that meets the
requirements of subsection 4;
(b) Submit to the Office with the application for a certificate of
eligibility:
(1) Written documentation from the lead participant that
affirms that the production company is located at the Summerlin
Production Studios Project and is producing, in whole or in part, a
qualified production at the Project;
(2) Proof that 70 percent or more of the funding for the
qualified production has been obtained; and
(3) Proof that:
(I) At least 50 percent of the total principal photography
days of the qualified production will take place in this State; or
(II) The qualified production will incur qualified direct
production expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000;
(c) Provide to the Office:
(1) With the application for a certificate of eligibility, proof
that the applicant has in place a workforce plan for the qualified
production that outlines specific goals for:
(I) Hiring a workforce that reflects the diversity of this
State, including, without limitation, the age, gender, gender identity
or expression, as defined in NRS 0.034, sexual orientation, ethnic
and geographic diversity of this State;
(II) Using vendors that are minority-owned business
enterprises or woman-owned business enterprises; and
(III) Achieving the requirements set forth in subsection 2
of section 12 of this act; and
(2) Not later than 365 days after the completion of principal
photography of the qualified production, unless the Office agrees to
extend this period by not more than 180 days, a final assessment of
the workforce plan that includes documentation on whether the
production met or made good faith efforts to achieve the goals set
forth in the workforce plan;
-
*AB238_R1*

– 15 –
(d) Not later than 365 days after the completion of principal
photography of the qualified production or, if any direct production
expenditures for postproduction will be incurred in this State, not
later than 365 days after the completion of postproduction, unless
the Office agrees to extend this period by not more than 180 days,
provide the Office with an audit of the qualified production that
includes:
(1) An itemized report of qualified direct production
expenditures which:
(I) Shows that the qualified production incurred qualified
direct production expenditures of $500,000 or more;
(II) If the production company complied with the
requirement of subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) by providing to
the Office with the application for a certificate of eligibility proof
that the qualified production would incur qualified direct production
expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000, shows that the
qualified production incurred qualified direct production
expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000; and
(III) Is certified by an independent certified public
accountant in this State who is approved by the Office;
(2) A list of each contractor, vendor, personal service
corporation or loan-out company or other business engaged by the
production company to provide goods or perform services in an
aggregate amount of at least $10,000 or more in this State in
connection with the qualified production and the amount paid to
each contractor, vendor, personal service corporation or loan-out
company or other business for such goods or services; and
(3) Proof that the production company secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production was produced;
(e) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (d);
(f) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that requires
the production company to include:
(1) In the end screen credits of the qualified production, a
logo of this State provided by the Office which indicates that the
qualified production was filmed or otherwise produced in Nevada;
or
(2) If the qualified production does not have end screen
credits, another acknowledgment in the final version of the qualified
production that indicates that the qualified production was filmed or
otherwise produced in Nevada or any alternative marketing
promotion acceptable to the Office; and
(g) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that requires
the production company to transmit to each contractor, vendor,
personal service corporation or loan-out company or other business
-
*AB238_R1*

– 16 –
engaged by the production company to provide goods or perform
services in an aggregate amount of at least $10,000 or more in this
State in connection with a qualified production, not later than 30
calendar days after the production company pays the contractor,
vendor, personal service corporation or loan-out company or other
business, a notification that includes:
(1) A statement that Nevada imposes:
(I) A tax on wages paid by certain employers pursuant to
chapters 363A and 363B of NRS; and
(II) A commerce tax on certain business entities pursuant
to chapter 363C of NRS; and
(2) Instructions for obtaining additional information from the
Department of Taxation regarding the collection and remittance of
taxes pursuant to chapters 363A, 363B and 363C of NRS.
4. An application for a certificate of eligibility submitted
pursuant to subsection 3 must contain:
(a) A script, storyboard or synopsis of the qualified production;
(b) The names of the production company, producer, director
and proposed cast;
(c) An estimated timeline to complete the qualified production;
(d) An estimate of the percentage of principal photography days
of the qualified production that will take place in this State and
outside this State;
(e) An insurance certificate, binder or quote for general liability
insurance of $1,000,000 or more;
(f) The business address of the production company;
(g) The written documentation from the lead participant that is
required by subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 3;
(h) The workforce plan of the production company required by
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of subsection 3; and
(i) Proof that the qualified production meets any applicable
requirements relating to workers’ compensation insurance.
5. Within 45 business days after receipt of a final assessment of
the workforce plan provided by a production company pursuant to
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (c) of subsection 3, an audit provided
by a production company pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 3
and any other accountings or other information required by the
Office, the Office shall determine whether to certify the audit and
make a final determination of whether a certificate of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits will be issued. If the Office
certifies the audit, determines that all other requirements for the film
infrastructure transferable tax credits have been met and determines
that a certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax credits will be
issued, the Office shall notify the production company and the lead
-
*AB238_R1*

– 17 –
participant that the film infrastructure transferable tax credits will be
issued.
6. Within 90 days after the receipt of the notice, the production
company shall make an irrevocable declaration of the amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits that will be applied to
each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, thereby accounting for all
of the credits that will be issued in relation to the qualified
production.
7. Upon receipt of the declaration required by subsection 6, the
Office shall issue to the production company a certificate of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits in the amount approved by the
Office for the fees or taxes included in the declaration of the
production company. The film infrastructure transferable tax credits
issued under the certificate may not be used before July 1, 2028.
The production company shall notify the Office upon transferring
any of the film infrastructure transferable tax credits. The Office
shall notify the Department of Taxation and the Nevada Gaming
Control Board of all film infrastructure transferable tax credits
issued, segregated by each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, and
the amount of any film infrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred.
8. Within 60 days after the production company uses any film
infrastructure transferable tax credits issued pursuant to subsection 7
or notifies the Office of any transfer of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits issued pursuant to subsection 7, the
production company shall pay to the Office an amount of money
equal to 1 percent of the amount of film infrastructure transferable
tax credits issued to the production company pursuant to subsection
7. The Office shall deposit any money received pursuant to this
subsection with the State Treasurer for credit to the Account for
Nevada Film, Media and Related Technology Education and
Vocational Training created by section 31 of this act. A payment
made pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed to be a payment
made from film infrastructure transferable tax credits which would
have been authorized and approved for the production company if a
payment pursuant to this section were not required.
9. An applicant for film infrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section shall, upon the request of the Executive
Director of the Office, furnish the Executive Director with copies of
all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 3.
10. The Office:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing:
-
*AB238_R1*

– 18 –
(1) Any additional qualified expenditures or production costs
that may serve as the basis for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act;
(2) The application review process;
(3) That a production for which records are required by 18
U.S.C. § 2257 to be maintained with respect to any performer in
such production is not eligible for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits; and
(4) Any necessary provisions to ensure compliance with the
requirements of paragraph (c) of subsection 3 relating to workforce
plans; and
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to ensure
that the provisions of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act are
carried out in a manner that is reasonable and customary in the
industry for the production of qualified productions.
11. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which film
infrastructure transferable tax credits will be administered.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary for the
Department of Taxation and the Nevada Gaming Control Board, as
applicable, to carry out the functions performed by each entity
pursuant to the provisions of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 11. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
qualified direct production expenditures that may serve as a basis
for film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued pursuant to
section 10 of this act must:
(a) Be expenditures made during the period in which a qualified
production is produced;
(b) Be customary and reasonable;
(c) Relate to a category of qualified expenditures and costs listed
in subsection 2; and
(d) Be:
(1) Purchases, rentals or leases of tangible personal property
or services from a Nevada business.
(2) The payroll, including wages, salaries and fringe benefits,
for Nevada residents or other personnel who provided services in
this State.
(3) Compensation paid to a producer, as included in the
calculation of the amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits in accordance with subsection 6.
(4) Payments made to a qualified entity for services
performed in this State by a qualified individual.
2. Expenditures or costs that may serve as a basis for
calculating film infrastructure transferable tax credits must relate to:
-
*AB238_R1*

– 19 –
(a) Set construction and operation;
(b) Wardrobe and makeup;
(c) Photography, sound and lighting;
(d) Filming, film processing and film editing;
(e) The rental or leasing of facilities, equipment and vehicles;
(f) Food and lodging;
(g) Editing, sound mixing, special effects, visual effects and
other postproduction services;
(h) Payment for goods or services provided by a Nevada
business;
(i) The design, construction, improvement or repair of property,
infrastructure, equipment or a production or postproduction facility;
(j) State and local government taxes to the extent not included as
part of another cost reported pursuant to this section; or
(k) Any other transaction, service or activity authorized in
regulations adopted by the Office pursuant to section 10 of this act.
3. Expenditures and costs:
(a) Related to:
(1) The acquisition, transfer or use of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits;
(2) Marketing and distribution;
(3) Financing, depreciation and amortization;
(4) The payment of any profits as a result of the qualified
production;
(5) The payment of the cost of the audit required by section
10 of this act; or
(6) The payment for any goods or services that are not
directly attributable to the qualified production;
(b) For which reimbursement is received, or for which
reimbursement is reasonably expected to be received;
(c) Which are paid to a joint venturer or a parent, subsidiary or
other affiliate of the production company, unless the amount paid
represents the fair market value, which may be represented by a rate
sheet, of the purchase, rental or lease of the property or services for
which payment is made;
(d) Which have been previously claimed as a basis for film
infrastructure transferable tax credits issued pursuant to section 10
of this act or noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to NRS 360.759,
 are not qualified direct production expenditures and are not
eligible to serve as a basis for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits issued pursuant to section 10 of this act.
4. If any tangible personal property is acquired by a Nevada
business from a vendor outside this State for immediate resale,
rental or lease to a production company that produces a qualified
-
*AB238_R1*

– 20 –
production, expenditures incurred by the production company for
the purchase, rental or lease of the property are qualified direct
production expenditures only if:
(a) The Nevada business regularly deals in property of that kind;
and
(b) The expenditures are otherwise qualified direct production
expenditures under the provisions of this section.
5. If any tangible personal property is acquired by the
production company as an asset, the calculation of the costs of the
tangible personal property that constitute a qualified direct
production expenditure must be performed in the manner prescribed
by the Office by regulation.
6. For the purposes of calculating qualified direct production
expenditures, the compensation payable to a producer in his or her
capacity as a producer must not exceed 10 percent of the portion of
the total budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Fringe benefits” means employee expenses paid by an
employer for the use of the employee’s services, including, without
limitation, payments made to a governmental entity, union dues,
health insurance premiums, payments to a pension plan and
payments for workers’ compensation insurance.
(b) “Qualified entity” means an entity that is:
(1) A personal service corporation, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
269A(b)(1), a payroll services corporation or any entity receiving
payments for services performed in this State by a qualified
individual; and
(2) Registered to conduct business pursuant to the laws of
this State.
(c) “Qualified individual” means any natural person who
performs services during the production period in an activity related
to the production of a qualified production. The term does not
include:
(1) Any natural person related to the production company or
an employee as described in subparagraph (A), (B) or (C) of 26
U.S.C. § 51(i)(1).
(2) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
416(i)(1)(B), of the production company.
Sec. 12. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 4 and section 13 of this act, the base amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits issued to an eligible
production company pursuant to section 10 of this act must equal 30
percent of the qualified direct production expenditures.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 21 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and section 13
of this act, if the production company submitted the application for
the certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 10 of this act on or after a date that is
more than 36 months after the date on which the development
agreement was executed pursuant to section 9 of this act, the Office
shall reduce the cumulative amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits that are calculated pursuant to this section:
(a) By 5 percent if less than 50 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents. For the
purposes of this paragraph:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2), the
percentage of the below-the-line personnel who are Nevada
residents must be determined by dividing the number of workdays
worked by Nevada residents who are below-the-line personnel by
the number of workdays worked by all below-the-line personnel;
and
(2) Any work performed by a background actor must not be
considered in the determination of the percentage of the below-the-
line personnel who are Nevada residents.
(b) By 5 percent if the final assessment of the workforce plan
submitted by the production company for the qualified production
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3 of section 10 of this act
does not include documentation that at least two of the following
requirements were met:
(1) The production company, distribution company or
financing company for the qualified production offered training or
work opportunities to traditionally underrepresented groups for the
development of skills required for employment as below-the-line
personnel or above-the-line personnel.
(2) Two or more persons who are members of a traditionally
underrepresented group are employed on the qualified production as
a casting director, cinematographer, composer, costume designer,
director, editor, hairstylist, makeup artist, producer, production
designer, set decorator, visual effects supervisor, writer, sound
editor, sound effects editor, sound mixer, Foley artist or other
similar personnel.
(3) Six or more persons who are members of a traditionally
underrepresented group are employed on the qualified production in
a technical role, including, without limitation, first assistant director,
gaffer, script supervisor, digital imaging technician or other similar
role.
(4) Not less than 20 percent of the below-the-line personnel
employed on the qualified production, not including background
actors, are members of a traditionally underrepresented group.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 22 –
(5) One or more entities affiliated with the production
company or distribution company has a program of substantive,
ongoing paid apprenticeships or internships that include members of
traditionally underrepresented groups in not less than three of the
following departments:
(I) Production and development;
(II) Physical production;
(III) Postproduction:
(IV) Music;
(V) Visual effects;
(VI) Acquisitions;
(VII) Business affairs;
(VIII) Distribution; or
(IX) Marketing and publicity.
3. The Executive Director of the Office shall waive a reduction
in the cumulative amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits required pursuant to:
(a) Paragraph (a) of subsection 2 upon written proof to the
Executive Director that the production company made a good faith
effort to hire the required percentage of below-the-line personnel
and there is an insufficient number of Nevada residents available
and qualified for such employment.
(b) Paragraph (b) of subsection 2 upon written proof to the
Executive Director that the production company made a good faith
effort to meet the requirements of that paragraph and there is an
insufficient number of persons available and qualified to meet the
requirements.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Executive
Director of the Office may:
(a) Reduce the cumulative amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits that are calculated pursuant to this section by
an amount equal to any damages incurred by the State or any
political subdivision of the State as a result of a qualified production
that is produced in this State; or
(b) Withhold film infrastructure transferable tax credits, in
whole or in part:
(1) Until any pending legal action in this State against a
production company or involving a qualified production is resolved.
(2) If a production company violates any state or local law.
(3) If a production company is found to have knowingly
submitted any false statement, representation or certification in any
document submitted for the purpose of obtaining film infrastructure
transferable tax credits.
5. Before taking any action authorized by subsection 4, the
Executive Director of the Office shall:
-
*AB238_R1*

– 23 –
(a) Consider any documentation submitted by the production
company related to the action under consideration; and
(b) Make the following determinations:
(1) That good cause exists to take such action;
(2) That the action is reasonable based on the circumstances
of the underlying incident on which the reduction or withholding of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits authorized pursuant to
subsection 4 is based; and
(3) The amount of any reduction or withholding of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits authorized pursuant to
subsection 4 is commensurate with the severity of the underlying
incident on which the reduction or withholding is based.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Racial or ethnic minority” means persons who are:
(1) Asian;
(2) Hispanic or Latino;
(3) Black or African American;
(4) Indigenous, Native American or Alaskan Native;
(5) Middle Eastern or North African;
(6) Native Hawaiian;
(7) Pacific Islander; or
(8) A member of any other underrepresented racial or ethnic
minority group.
(b) “Traditionally underrepresented group” means:
(1) Women;
(2) A racial or ethnic minority group;
(3) A group of persons who identify as LGBTQ, which
means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, intersex or any
other nonheterosexual or noncisgender orientation or gender identity
or expression;
(4) A group of persons with disabilities, as defined in
NRS 426.068;
(5) Veterans;
(6) Persons who are currently serving on active duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States; or
(7) Persons who were previously incarcerated in a jail or
prison.
(c) “Veteran” means a person who has served in the Armed
Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or the
National Guard and was separated from such service under
conditions other than dishonorable.
Sec. 13. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Office shall not approve any application for a certificate of
eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax credits submitted
pursuant to section 10 of this act if:
-
*AB238_R1*

– 24 –
(a) Approval of the application would cause the total amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits approved pursuant to
section 10 of this act to exceed the sum of $95,000,000 for each
fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028.
(b) The application is submitted by a production company in a
fiscal year that begins on or after July 1, 2043.
2. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
1 and subsection 3, the amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits authorized for a fiscal year that are not approved for that
fiscal year may be carried forward and made available for approval
only during the next fiscal year, but the amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits carried forward and made
available for approval during the next fiscal year must not exceed
$47,500,000. For any fiscal year to which film infrastructure
transferable tax credits are carried forward from the immediately
preceding fiscal year pursuant to this subsection, the film
infrastructure transferable tax credits that have been carried forward
must be deemed to be the first film infrastructure transferable tax
credits approved until the total amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits carried forward from the immediately
preceding fiscal year have been approved.
3. If the Summerlin Production Studios Project does not satisfy
the criteria set forth in subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of section 9 of this act, the Office shall not issue a
certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax credits to a
production company that produces a qualified production for which
a certificate of eligibility has been issued pursuant to section 10 of
this act.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the Office
approves an application for a certificate of eligibility pursuant to
section 10 of this act:
(a) Before July 1, 2028, the Office shall assign the amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits identified under the
certificate of eligibility to Fiscal Year 2028-2029.
(b) On or after July 1, 2028, the Office shall assign the amount
of film infrastructure transferable tax credits identified under the
certificate of eligibility to the fiscal year in which the application for
the certificate of eligibility is approved.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the Office
under a certificate of eligibility issued to a production company
pursuant to section 10 of this act that exceeds the amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the Office under a
certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax credits approved by
the Office under a certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax
-
*AB238_R1*

– 25 –
credits issued to the production company pursuant to section 10 of
this act may be added to the amount made available for approval
during subsequent fiscal years.
6. The film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued to any
production company for any qualified production pursuant to
section 10 of this act expire at the end of the calendar year that is 6
years after the date on which the film infrastructure transferable tax
credits are issued to the production company.
Sec. 14. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
if an application for a certificate of eligibility is approved pursuant
to section 10 of this act, principal photography of the qualified
production must begin not more than 90 days after the date on
which the decision on the application is issued. The Office:
(a) Shall prescribe by regulation the procedure for determining
the date of commencement of qualified productions that do not
include photography for the purposes of this section.
(b) May extend by not more than 90 days the period otherwise
prescribed by this subsection, except that in the case of a force
majeure, the Office may extend the period for more than 90 days.
2. A production company that produces a qualified production
shall submit the final assessment of the workforce plan and audit
required by section 10 of this act and all other required information
to the Office and the Department of Taxation within the time
required by paragraph (c) or (d) of subsection 3 of section 10 of this
act, as applicable. Production of the qualified production must be
completed within 18 months after the date of commencement of
principal photography, except that the Office may extend this period
for completion of the qualified production by not more than 6
months. If the Office or the Department determines that information
submitted pursuant to this subsection is incomplete, the production
company shall, not later than 30 days after receiving notice that the
information is incomplete, provide to the Office or the Department,
as applicable, all additional information required by the Office or
the Department.
Sec. 15. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
production company that is found to have knowingly submitted any
false statement, representation or certification in any document
submitted for the purpose of obtaining film infrastructure
transferable tax credits, or that otherwise becomes ineligible for film
infrastructure transferable tax credits after receiving the film
infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to section 10 of this
act, shall repay to the Department of Taxation or the Nevada
Gaming Control Board, as applicable, any portion of the film
infrastructure transferable tax credits to which the production
company is not entitled.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 26 –
2. Film infrastructure transferable tax credits purchased in
good faith are not subject to forfeiture or repayment by the
transferee unless the transferee submitted fraudulent information in
connection with the purchase.
3. A production company is not required to forfeit or repay any
portion of the film infrastructure transferable tax credits to which
the production company is otherwise entitled if the production
company demonstrates that the production company became
ineligible for the film infrastructure transferable tax credits as a
result of unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the
production company, including, without limitation, an event in the
nature of force majeure.
Sec. 15.3. 1. The Clark County Board of County
Commissioners shall create a production studio entertainment
district for the purpose of enhancing early childhood education
opportunities, including public prekindergarten, for children in
Clark County. The district must:
(a) Be located entirely within the unincorporated areas of Clark
County and outside the boundaries of any incorporated city; and
(b) Include only parcels of land that are located within the
boundaries of the Summerlin Production Studios Project, excluding
any parcels on which a business required to hold a gaming license
issued pursuant to chapter 463 of NRS is located.
2. To make payments pursuant to subsection 3, the Clark
County Board of County Commissioners shall pledge the proceeds
of:
(a) The tax imposed pursuant to NRS 244.335 at the rate of 2
percent of the gross receipts from the rental of transient lodging
within the production studio entertainment district;
(b) The taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS on
property of any kind within the production studio entertainment
district for the general operating expenses of Clark County;
(c) The taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS on
property of any kind within the production studio entertainment
district for the general operating expenses of Summerlin Town; and
(d) The basic city-county relief tax, as defined in NRS 377.020,
with regard to tangible personal property sold at retail, or stored,
used or otherwise consumed, in the production studio entertainment
district.
3. After the creation of the production studio entertainment
district, the Department of Taxation, the Clark County Board of
County Commissioners and the Board of Trustees of the Clark
County School District shall enter into an agreement to transfer
money secured by a pledge of, and payable from, any money
pledged pursuant to subsection 2 and received with respect to the
-
*AB238_R1*

– 27 –
district. The agreement must provide for a transfer to the Clark
County School District of money pledged pursuant to subsection 2
and received by the Department of Taxation or Clark County,
including, without limitation, specifying the dates and procedure for
the distribution of money pledged pursuant to subsection 2. An
agreement entered into pursuant to this section is not subject to the
limitations of subsection 1 of NRS 354.626 and may, at the option
of the Clark County Board of County Commissioners, be binding on
Clark County beyond the fiscal year in which it was made, if the
agreement pertains solely to the money pledged pursuant to
subsection 2.
4. The Clark County School District shall:
(a) Deposit all money received pursuant to this section in a
separate account established and administered by the Board of
Trustees of the Clark County School District and use money in such
account solely for the purposes of pre-kindergarten education
programs in the Clark County School District.
(b) Submit a report on or before July 1 of each year on the use
of all money received pursuant to this section to the Office of
Economic Development within the Office of the Governor. The
Office shall include the report received from the Clark County
School District in the report required pursuant to section 16 of this
act.
5. The Department of Taxation may adopt regulations
regarding procedures for the identification and segmentation with
respect to the production studio entertainment district of the taxes,
fees and charges described in subsection 2.
6. The Clark County Board of County Commissioners may
adopt, by ordinance, procedures for the identification and
segmentation with respect to the production studio entertainment
district of the taxes, fees and charges described in subsection 2.
7. The Department of Taxation and Clark County, and any
other local government or public body to which the taxes, fees and
charges described in subsection 2 are paid, shall provide
commercially reasonable procedures by which such taxes, fees and
charges paid by any business or other person operating in the
production studio entertainment district are to be identified and
segmented. All such businesses or other persons operating in the
production studio entertainment district shall follow the established
commercially reasonable procedures.
8. The provisions of this section must not be applied to modify,
directly or indirectly, any taxes levied or revenues pledged in such a
manner as to impair adversely any outstanding obligations of any
local government or the State, including, without limitation, bonds,
notes, medium-term financing, letters of credit and any other
-
*AB238_R1*

– 28 –
financial obligation, until all such obligations have been discharged
in full or provision for their payment and redemption has been fully
made.
Sec. 15.7. 1. The lead participant shall, on or before
October 1 of each even-numbered year, prepare and submit to the
Governor, the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature and the Office a report on the
performance of the project for the immediately preceding fiscal
years. The report must include:
(a) The following information concerning the development of
the Project:
(1) The cumulative capital investment, by component,
including the studio campus, vocational-training studio and
supporting uses;
(2) Square footage delivered and acreage improved, by
component;
(3) The status of capital investment requirements and
requirements for qualified direct production expenditures included
in the development agreement pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of section 9 of this act;
(4) Any improvements to public infrastructure installed or
financed by the Project;
(5) Any capital investment outside of the site of the Project
credited toward meeting the capital investment requirements
included in the development agreement pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of section 9 of this act;
(6) The primary user or tenant of each completed building
and space occupied and a brief business description; and
(7) The share of total occupied square footage used by firms
whose principal business supports motion picture, television, digital
media or related content-creation activities.
(b) The following information concerning the production of
qualified productions, in whole or in part, at the site of the Project:
(1) The number of applications submitted for a certificate of
eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to
section 10 of this act;
(2) The number of qualified productions for which film
infrastructure transferable tax credits were approved;
(3) The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
approved;
(4) The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
used;
(5) The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred;
-
*AB238_R1*

– 29 –
(6) The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
taken against each allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount
used and outstanding, in total and for each qualified production;
(7) The aggregate amount of the qualified direct production
expenditures incurred by qualified productions and the portion of
those expenditures that were incurred in Nevada;
(8) The aggregate number of persons in Nevada employed by
qualified productions, the aggregate amount of wages paid to those
persons and aggregated demographic information concerning those
persons;
(9) The period during which each qualified production was in
Nevada and employed persons in Nevada;
(10) The number of qualified productions that were produced
by persons or entities that are affiliated with the Summerlin
Production Studios Project and the number of qualified productions
that were produced by persons or entities that are not affiliated with
the Project; and
(11) Demographic information concerning persons who
participate in a program of vocational training and education offered
at the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio.
2. Not later than 10 days after receiving a report required by
subsection 1, the Office shall post the report on the Internet website
of the Office.
Sec. 16. The Office shall, on or before October 1 of each even-
numbered year, prepare and submit to the Governor and to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Legislature a report that includes, for the immediately preceding
fiscal years:
1. The number of applications submitted for a certificate of
eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to
section 10 of this act;
2. The number of qualified productions for which film
infrastructure transferable tax credits were approved;
3. The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
approved;
4. The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
used;
5. The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred;
6. The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
taken against each allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount
used and outstanding, in total and for each qualified production;
7. The aggregate amount of the qualified direct production
expenditures incurred by qualified productions and the portion of
those expenditures that were incurred in Nevada;
-
*AB238_R1*

– 30 –
8. The aggregate number of persons in Nevada employed by
qualified productions, the aggregate amount of wages paid to those
persons and aggregated demographic information concerning those
persons;
9. The period during which each qualified production was in
Nevada and employed persons in Nevada;
10. The number of qualified productions that were produced by
persons or entities that are affiliated with the Summerlin Production
Studios Project and the number of qualified productions that were
produced by persons or entities that are not affiliated with the
Project;
11. Recommendations for strengthening the overall operation
of the program for the issuance of film infrastructure transferable
tax credits, including, without limitation, methods to promote and
encourage the development and establishment of production
companies in Nevada, including, without limitation, production
companies that are not affiliated with the Summerlin Production
Studios Project;
12. Demographic information concerning persons who
participate in a program of vocational training and education offered
at the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio; and
13. The compilation of information provided in reports made
by recipients of grants from the Account for Nevada Film, Media
and Related Technology Education and Vocational Training created
by section 31 of this act, which is provided to the Office pursuant to
section 33 of this act.
Sec. 17. NRS 360.7582 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7582 “Below-the-line personnel” means a person
employed to work on a qualified production after production begins
and before production is completed, including, without limitation,
[an extra,] a background actor, best boy, boom operator, camera
loader, camera operator, assistant camera operator, compositor,
dialogue editor, film editor, assistant film editor, focus puller, Foley
operator, Foley editor, gaffer, grip, key grip, lighting crew, lighting
board operator, lighting technician, music editor, sound editor,
sound effects editor, sound mixer, steadicam operator, first assistant
camera operator, second assistant camera operator, digital imaging
technician, camera operator working with a director of photography,
electric best boy, grip best boy, dolly grip, rigging grip, assistant
key for makeup, assistant key for hair, assistant script supervisor, set
construction foreperson, lead set dresser, assistant key for wardrobe,
scenic foreperson, assistant propmaster, assistant audio mixer,
assistant boom person, assistant key for special effects and other
similar personnel. The term does not include above-the-line
personnel.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 31 –
Sec. 18. NRS 360.7586 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7586 1. “Qualified production” includes preproduction,
production and postproduction and means:
(a) A theatrical, direct-to-video or other media motion picture.
(b) A made-for-television motion picture.
(c) Visual effects or digital animation sequences.
(d) A television pilot program.
(e) A television, Internet or other media series, including,
without limitation, a comedy, drama, miniseries, soap opera, talk
show, game show or telenovela, or an episode of such a series.
(f) A reality show.
(g) A national or regional commercial or series of commercials.
(h) An infomercial.
(i) A music video.
(j) A documentary film or series.
(k) Other visual media productions, including, without
limitation, video games , digital media and mobile applications.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A news, weather or current events program.
(b) A production that is primarily produced for industrial,
corporate or institutional use.
(c) A telethon or any production that solicits money, other than a
production which is produced for national distribution.
(d) A political advertisement.
(e) A sporting event, including, without limitation, a sportscast,
preshow, postshow or sports newscast related to a sporting event. A
qualified production described by subsection 1 shall not be deemed
a sporting event for the purposes of this paragraph for the sole
reason that it features athletes or relates to sports.
(f) A gala, pageant or awards show.
(g) Any type of media production created solely for the purpose
of posting the production on social media, as defined in
NRS 232.003.
(h) Any other type of production that is excluded by regulations
adopted by the Office of Economic Development pursuant to
NRS 360.759.
Sec. 19. NRS 360.759 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.759 1. A production company that produces a qualified
production in this State in whole or in part may apply to the Office
of Economic Development for a certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits for any qualified direct
production expenditures. The noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
-
*AB238_R1*

– 32 –
(b) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed pursuant to chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. The Office [may] shall approve an application for a
certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits if the Office finds that the production company producing
the qualified production qualifies for the noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to subsection 3. If the Office
approves the application, the Office shall [calculate] :
(a) Calculate the estimated amount of the noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.7592, 360.7593 and
360.7594 [.] ; and
(b) Immediately forward a copy of the certificate of eligibility
that identifies the estimated amount of the noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits to:
(1) The applicant;
(2) The Department of Taxation; and
(3) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
3. To be eligible for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section, a production company must:
(a) [Submit] Before the beginning of principal photography,
submit to the Office an application for a certificate of eligibility that
meets the requirements of subsection 4;
(b) [Provide proof satisfactory to the Office that the qualified
production is in the economic interest of the State;
(c)] Provide [proof satisfactory] with the application for a
certificate of eligibility:
(1) Proof to the Office that 70 percent or more of the funding
for the qualified production has been obtained;
[(d) Provide proof satisfactory] and
(2) Proof to the Office that [at] :
(I) At least [60] 50 percent of the [direct production
expenditures for:
(1) Preproduction;
(2) Production; and
(3) If any direct production expenditures for postproduction
will be incurred in this State, postproduction,
] total principal photography days of the qualified production
will [be incurred] take place in this State [as qualified direct
production expenditures;
(e)] ; or
(II) The qualified production will incur qualified direct
production expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000;
-
*AB238_R1*

– 33 –
(c) Provide to the Office:
(1) With the application for the certificate of eligibility,
proof that the applicant has in place a workforce plan for the
qualified production that outlines specific goals for:
(I) Hiring a workforce that reflects the diversity of this
State, including, without limitation, the age, gender, gender
identity or expression, as defined in NRS 0.034, sexual
orientation, ethnic and geographic diversity of this State;
(II) Using vendors that are minority-owned business
enterprises or woman-owned business enterprises; and
(III) Achieving the requirements set forth in subsection
3 of 360.7592; and
(2) Not later than 365 days after the completion of principal
photography of the qualified production, unless the Office agrees
to extend this period by not more than 180 days, a final assessment
of the workforce plan that includes documentation on whether the
production met or made good faith efforts to achieve the goals set
forth in the workforce plan;
(d) Not later than [270] 365 days after the completion of
principal photography of the qualified production or, if any direct
production expenditures for postproduction will be incurred in this
State, not later than [270] 365 days after the completion of
postproduction, unless the Office agrees to extend this period by not
more than [90] 180 days, provide the Office with an audit of the
qualified production that includes [an] :
(1) An itemized report of qualified direct production
expenditures which:
[(1)] (I) Shows that the qualified production incurred
qualified direct production expenditures of $500,000 or more; [and
(2)] (II) If the production company complied with the
requirement of subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) by providing to
the Office with the application for a certificate of eligibility proof
that the qualified production would incur qualified direct
production expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000, shows
that the qualified production incurred qualified direct production
expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000; and
(III) Is certified by an independent certified public
accountant in this State who is approved by the Office;
(2) A list of each contractor, vendor, personal service
corporation or loan-out company or other business engaged by the
production company to provide goods or perform services in an
aggregate amount of at least $10,000 or more in this State in
connection with the qualified production and the amount paid to
each contractor, vendor, personal service corporation or loan-out
company or other business for such goods or services; and
-
*AB238_R1*

– 34 –
(3) Proof that the production company secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production was produced;
[(f)] (e) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph [(e);]
(d); and
[(g)] (f) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that
requires the production company to include:
(1) In the end screen credits of the qualified production, a
logo of this State provided by the Office which indicates that the
qualified production was filmed or otherwise produced in Nevada;
or
(2) If the qualified production does not have end screen
credits, another acknowledgment in the final version of the qualified
production which indicates that the qualified production was filmed
or otherwise produced in Nevada [;] or any alternative marketing
promotion acceptable to the Office; and
[(h) Meet any other requirements prescribed by regulation
pursuant to this section.]
(g) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that requires
the production company to transmit to each contractor, vendor,
personal service corporation or loan-out company or other
business engaged by the production company to provide goods or
perform services in an aggregate amount of at least $10,000 or
more in this State in connection with a qualified production, not
later than 30 calendar days after the production company pays the
contractor, vendor, personal service corporation or loan-out
company or other business, a notification that includes:
(1) A statement that Nevada imposes:
(I) A tax on wages paid by certain employers pursuant to
chapters 363A and 363B of NRS; and
(II) A commerce tax on certain business entities
pursuant to chapter 363C of NRS; and
(2) Instructions for obtaining additional information from
the Department of Taxation regarding the collection and
remittance of taxes pursuant to chapters 363A, 363B and 363C of
NRS.
4. An application for a certificate of eligibility submitted
pursuant to subsection 3 must contain:
(a) A script, storyboard or synopsis of the qualified production;
(b) The names of the production company, producer, director
and proposed cast;
(c) An estimated timeline to complete the qualified production;
(d) [A summary of the budgeted expenditures for the entire
production, including projected expenditures to be incurred outside
of Nevada;] An estimate of the percentage of principal
-
*AB238_R1*

– 35 –
photography days of the qualified production that will take place
in this State and outside this State;
(e) Details regarding the financing of the project, including,
without limitation, any information relating to a binding financing
commitment, loan application, commitment letter or investment
letter;
(f) An insurance certificate, binder or quote for general liability
insurance of $1,000,000 or more;
(g) The business address of the production company;
(h) Proof that the qualified production meets any applicable
requirements relating to workers’ compensation insurance; and
(i) [Proof that the production company has secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production will be produced; and
(j) Any other information required by regulations adopted by the
Office pursuant to subsection 8.] The workforce plan of the
production company that is required by paragraph (c) of
subsection 3.
5. [If the Office approves an application for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a copy of the certificate of
eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of the tax credits
available pursuant to NRS 360.7592 to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
6.] Within [60] 45 business days after receipt of a final
assessment of the workforce plan provided by a production
company pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3, an audit
provided by a production company pursuant to paragraph [(e)] (d) of
subsection 3 and any other accountings or other information
required by the Office, the Office shall determine whether to certify
the audit and make a final determination of whether a certificate of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits will be issued. If the
Office certifies the audit, determines that all other requirements for
the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits have been met and
determines that a certificate of noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits will be issued, the Office shall notify the production
company that the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits will be
issued.
6. Within [30] 90 days after the receipt of the notice, the
production company shall make an irrevocable declaration of the
amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits that will be
applied to each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, thereby
accounting for all of the credits which will be issued [.] in relation
-
*AB238_R1*

– 36 –
to the qualified production. Upon receipt of the declaration, the
Office shall issue to the production company a certificate of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits in the amount approved
by the Office for the fees or taxes included in the declaration of the
production company. The production company shall notify the
Office upon transferring any of the noninfrastructure transferable
tax credits. The Office shall notify the Department and the Nevada
Gaming Control Board of all noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax set forth in subsection
1, and the amount of any noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred.
7. Within 60 days after the production company uses any
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued pursuant to
subsection 6 or notifies the Office of any transfer of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued pursuant to
subsection 6, the production company shall pay to the Office an
amount of money equal to 1 percent of the amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued to the production
company pursuant to subsection 6. The Office shall deposit any
money received pursuant to this subsection with the State
Treasurer for credit to the Account for Nevada Film, Media and
Related Technology Education and Vocational Training created
by section 31 of this act. A payment made pursuant to this
subsection shall be deemed to be a payment made from
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits which would have been
authorized and approved for the production company if a payment
pursuant to this section were not required.
8. An applicant for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section shall, upon the request of the Executive
Director of the Office, furnish the Executive Director with copies of
all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 3.
[8.] 9. The Office:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing:
(1) [Any additional requirements to receive transferable tax
credits;
(2)] Any additional qualified expenditures or production
costs that may serve as the basis for noninfrastructure transferable
tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.7591;
[(3) Any additional information that must be included with
an application pursuant to subsection 4;
(4)] (2) The application review process;
[(5) Any type of qualified]
(3) That a production for which [, due to obscene or sexually
explicit material,] records are required by 18 U.S.C. § 2257 to be
-
*AB238_R1*

– 37 –
maintained with respect to any performer in such production is not
eligible for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits; and
[(6) The requirements for notice pursuant to NRS 360.7595;]
(4) Any necessary provisions to ensure compliance with the
requirements of paragraph (c) of subsection 3 relating to
workforce plans; and
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to [carry
out] ensure that the provisions of NRS 360.758 to 360.7598,
inclusive [.] , are carried out in a manner that is reasonable and
customary within the industry for the production of qualified
productions.
[9.] 10. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits will be administered.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to carry
out the functions performed by each entity pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive.
Sec. 20. NRS 360.7591 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7591 1. [Qualified] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 3, qualified direct production expenditures that may
serve as a basis for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
issued pursuant to NRS 360.759 must [be for purchases,] :
(a) Be expenditures made during the period in which a
qualified production is produced;
(b) Be customary and reasonable;
(c) Relate to a category of qualified expenditures and costs
listed in subsection 2; and
(d) Be:
(1) Purchases, rentals or leases of tangible personal property
or services from a Nevada business . [during the period in which a
qualified production is produced, must be customary and reasonable
and]
(2) The payroll, including wages, salaries and fringe
benefits, for Nevada residents or other personnel who provided
services in this State, as included in the calculation of the amount
of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits in accordance with
subsection 6.
(3) Compensation paid to a producer, as included in the
calculation of the amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits in accordance with subsection 6.
(4) Payments made to a qualified entity for services
performed in this State by a qualified individual.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 38 –
2. Expenditures or costs that may serve as a basis for
calculating noninfrastructure transferable tax credits must relate
to:
(a) Set construction and operation;
(b) Wardrobe and makeup;
(c) Photography, sound and lighting;
(d) Filming, film processing and film editing;
(e) The rental or leasing of facilities, equipment and vehicles;
(f) Food and lodging;
(g) Editing, sound mixing, special effects, visual effects and
other postproduction services;
(h) [The payroll for Nevada residents or other personnel who
provided services in this State;
(i)] Payment for goods or services provided by a Nevada
business;
[(j)] (i) The design, construction, improvement or repair of
property, infrastructure, equipment or a production or
postproduction facility;
[(k)] (j) State and local government taxes to the extent not
included as part of another cost reported pursuant to this section;
[(l) Fees paid to a producer who is a Nevada resident; and
(m)] or
(k) Any other transaction, service or activity authorized in
regulations adopted by the Office of Economic Development
pursuant to NRS 360.759.
[2.] 3. Expenditures and costs:
(a) Related to:
(1) The acquisition, transfer or use of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits;
(2) Marketing and distribution;
(3) Financing, depreciation and amortization;
(4) The payment of any profits as a result of the qualified
production;
(5) The payment for the cost of the audit required by NRS
360.759; and
(6) The payment for any goods or services that are not
directly attributable to the qualified production;
(b) For which reimbursement is received, or for which
reimbursement is reasonably expected to be received;
(c) Which are paid to a joint venturer or a parent, subsidiary or
other affiliate of the production company, unless the amount paid
represents the fair market value , which may be represented by a
rate sheet, of the purchase, rental or lease of the property or services
for which payment is made;
-
*AB238_R1*

– 39 –
(d) [Which provide a pass-through benefit to a person who is not
a Nevada resident; or
(e)] Which have been previously claimed as a basis for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits [,] issued pursuant to
NRS 360.759 or film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to section 10 of this act,
 are not qualified direct production expenditures and are not
eligible to serve as a basis for transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to NRS 360.759.
[3.] 4. If any tangible personal property is acquired by a
Nevada business from a vendor outside this State for immediate
resale, rental or lease to a production company that produces a
qualified production, expenditures incurred by the production
company for the purchase, rental or lease of the property are
qualified direct production expenditures only if:
(a) The Nevada business regularly deals in property of that kind;
and
(b) The expenditures are otherwise qualified direct production
expenditures under the provisions of this section . [; and
(c) Not more than 50 percent of the property purchased, rented
or leased by the production company for the qualified production is
acquired and purchased, rented or leased in the manner described in
this subsection. In making the calculation required by this
paragraph, the cost of any property that remains an asset of the
Nevada business after production of the qualified production has
ended must not be included in the calculation as property purchased,
rented or leased in the manner described in this subsection.
4.] 5. If any tangible personal property is acquired by the
production company as an asset, the calculation of the costs of the
tangible personal property that constitute a qualified direct
production expenditure must be performed in the manner prescribed
by the Office [of Economic Development] by regulation.
6. For the purposes of calculating qualified direct production
expenditures:
(a) For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits before July 1, 2028, or
on or after July 1, 2043:
(1) The compensation payable to all producers who are
Nevada residents must not exceed 10 percent of the portion of the
total budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
(2) The compensation payable to all producers who are not
Nevada residents must not exceed 5 percent of the portion of the
-
*AB238_R1*

– 40 –
total budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
(3) The compensation payable to any employee, any
independent contractor or any other person who is below-the-line
personnel and who is paid a wage or salary as compensation for
providing labor services on the production of the qualified
production must not exceed $750,000.
(b) For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits on or after July 1, 2028,
and before July 1, 2043, the compensation payable to a producer
in his or her capacity as a producer must not exceed 10 percent of
the portion of the total budget of the qualified production that was
expended in or attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Fringe benefits” means employee expenses paid by an
employer for the use of the employee’s services, including, without
limitation, payments made to a governmental entity, union dues,
health insurance premiums, payments to a pension plan and
payments for workers’ compensation insurance.
(b) “Qualified entity” means an entity that is:
(1) A personal service corporation, as defined in 26 U.S.C.
§ 269A(b)(1), a payroll services corporation or any entity receiving
payments for services performed in this State by a qualified
individual; and
(2) Registered to conduct business pursuant to the laws of
this State.
(c) “Qualified individual” means any natural person who
performs services during the production period in an activity
related to the production of a qualified production. The term does
not include:
(1) Any natural person related to the production company
or an employee of the production company, as described in
subparagraph (A), (B) or (C) of 26 U.S.C. § 51(i)(1).
(2) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
416(i)(1)(B), of the production company.
Sec. 21. NRS 360.7592 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7592 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4
and NRS 360.7593 and 360.7594, the base amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued to an eligible
production company pursuant to NRS 360.759 :
(a) For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits before July 1, 2028, or
-
*AB238_R1*

– 41 –
on or after July 1, 2043, must equal 15 percent of the qualified
direct production expenditures.
(b) For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits on or after July 1, 2028,
and before July 1, 2043, must equal 30 percent of the qualified
direct production expenditures.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections [3] 4 and [4] 5
and NRS 360.7594, if an eligible production company submitted
the application for the certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS
360.759 before July 1, 2028, or on or after July 1, 2043, in addition
to the base amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued
to [an] the eligible production company [pursuant to NRS 360.759]
must include credits in an amount equal to:
(a) An additional 5 percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures if more than 50 percent of the below-the-line personnel
of the qualified production are Nevada residents; and
(b) An additional 5 percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures if more than 50 percent of the filming days of the
qualified production occurred in a county in this State in which, in
each of the 2 years immediately preceding the date of application,
qualified productions incurred less than $10,000,000 of qualified
direct production expenditures.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and 6 and
NRS 360.7594, if an eligible production company submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after
July 1, 2031, and before July 1, 2043, the Office shall reduce the
cumulative amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
calculated pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1:
(a) By 5 percent if less than 50 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(b) By 5 percent if the final assessment of the workforce plan
submitted by the production company for the qualified production
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3 of NRS 360.759 does
not include documentation that at least two of the following
requirements were met:
(1) The production company, distribution company or
financing company for the qualified production offered training
or work opportunities to members of traditionally
underrepresented groups for the development of skills required for
employment as below-the-line personnel or above-the-line
personnel.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 42 –
(2) Two or more persons who are members of a
traditionally underrepresented group are employed on the
qualified production as a casting director, cinematographer,
composer, costume designer, director, editor, hairstylist, makeup
artist, producer, production designer, set decorator, visual effects
supervisor, writer, sound editor, sound effects editor, sound mixer,
Foley artist or other similar personnel.
(3) Six or more persons who are members of a traditionally
underrepresented group are employed on the qualified production
in a technical role, including, without limitation, first assistant
director, gaffer, script supervisor, digital imaging technician or
other similar role.
(4) Not less than 20 percent of the below-the-line personnel
employed on the qualified production, not including background
actors, are members of a traditionally underrepresented group.
(5) One or more entities affiliated with the production
company or distribution company has a program of substantive,
ongoing paid apprenticeships or internships that includes
members of traditionally underrepresented groups in not less than
three of the following departments:
(I) Production and development;
(II) Physical production;
(III) Postproduction;
(IV) Music;
(V) Visual effects;
(VI) Acquisitions;
(VII) Business affairs;
(VIII) Distribution; or
(IX) Marketing and publicity.
4. The Executive Director of the Office shall waive a
reduction in the cumulative amount of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits required pursuant to:
(a) Paragraph (a) of subsection 3 upon written proof to the
Executive Director that the production company made a good
faith effort to hire the required percentage of below-the-line
personnel and there is an insufficient number of Nevada residents
available and qualified for such employment.
(b) Paragraph (b) of subsection 3 upon written proof to the
Executive Director that the production company made a good
faith effort to meet the requirements of that paragraph and there
is an insufficient number of persons available and qualified to
meet the requirements.
5. For the purposes of paragraph (a) of subsection 2:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the percentage of the below-the-line personnel who are
-
*AB238_R1*

– 43 –
Nevada residents must be determined by dividing the number of
workdays worked by Nevada residents who are below-the-line
personnel by the number of workdays worked by all below-the-line
personnel.
(b) Any work performed by [an extra] a background actor must
not be considered in determining the percentage of the below-the-
line personnel who are Nevada residents.
[4. The]
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the
Executive Director of the Office may:
(a) Reduce the cumulative amount of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits that are calculated pursuant to this section by
an amount equal to any damages incurred by the State or any
political subdivision of the State as a result of a qualified production
that is produced in this State; or
(b) Withhold the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits, in
whole or in part:
(1) Until any pending legal action in this State against a
production company or involving a qualified production is resolved.
(2) If a production company violates any state or local law.
(3) If a production company is found to have knowingly
submitted any false statement, representation or certification in any
document submitted for the purpose of obtaining noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits.
7. Before taking any action authorized by subsection 6, the
Executive Director of the Office shall:
(a) Consider any documentation submitted by the production
company related to the action under consideration; and
(b) Make the following determinations:
(1) That good cause exists to take such action;
(2) That the action is reasonable based on the
circumstances of the underlying incident on which the reduction
or withholding of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
authorized pursuant to subsection 6 is based; and
(3) The amount of any reduction or withholding of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits authorized pursuant to
subsection 6 is commensurate with severity of the underlying
incident on which the reduction or withholding is based.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Racial or ethnic minority” means persons who are:
(1) Asian;
(2) Hispanic or Latino;
(3) Black or African American;
(4) Indigenous, Native American or Alaskan Native;
(5) Middle Eastern or North African;
-
*AB238_R1*

– 44 –
(6) Native Hawaiian;
(7) Pacific Islander; or
(8) A member of any other underrepresented racial or
ethnic minority group.
(b) “Traditionally underrepresented group” means:
(1) Women;
(2) A racial or ethnic minority group;
(3) A group of persons who identify as LGBTQ, which
means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, intersex or any
other nonheterosexual or noncisgender orientation or gender
identity or expression;
(4) A group of persons with disabilities, as defined in
NRS 426.068;
(5) Veterans;
(6) Persons who are currently serving on active duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States; or
(7) Persons who were previously incarcerated in a jail or
prison.
(c) “Veteran” means a person who has served in the Armed
Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or the
National Guard and was separated from such service under
conditions other than dishonorable.
Sec. 22. NRS 360.7593 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7593 1. [In] For an eligible production company that
submitted the application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits before July 1, 2028, or
on or after July 1, 2043, in calculating the base amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to subsection 1
of NRS 360.7592:
(a) Wages and salaries, including fringe benefits, paid to above-
the-line personnel who are not Nevada residents must be included in
the calculation at a rate of 12 percent.
(b) Wages and salaries, including fringe benefits, paid to below-
the-line personnel who are not Nevada residents [:
(1) For the period beginning January 1, 2014, and ending
December 31, 2014, must be included in the calculation at a rate of
12 percent.
(2) For the period beginning January 1, 2015, and ending
December 31, 2015, must be included in the calculation at a rate of
10 percent.
(3) For the period beginning January 1, 2016, and ending
December 31, 2016, must be included in the calculation at a rate of
8 percent.
(4) For the period beginning January 1, 2017,] must not be
included in the calculation.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 45 –
2. As used in this section, “fringe benefits” means employee
expenses paid by an employer for the use of a person’s services,
including, without limitation, payments made to a governmental
entity, union dues, health insurance premiums, payments to a
pension plan and payments for workers’ compensation insurance.
Sec. 23. NRS 360.7594 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7594 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the Office [of Economic Development] shall not approve any
application for a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits submitted pursuant to NRS 360.759 if
approval of the application would cause the total amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits approved pursuant to
NRS 360.759 for each [fiscal] :
(a) Fiscal year commencing before July 1, 2028, or on or after
July 1, 2043, to exceed the sum of $10,000,000. [Any] Except as
otherwise provided in this paragraph, any portion of the
$10,000,000 per fiscal year for which noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits have not previously been approved by the
Office under an application for a certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits submitted pursuant to
NRS 360.759 may be carried forward and made available for
approval during the next or any future fiscal year.
Noninfrastructure transferable tax credits that are available for
approval for a fiscal year commencing before July 1, 2028, but
have not been approved for a fiscal year commencing before
July 1, 2028, must not be carried forward and made available for
approval during any fiscal year commencing on or after July 1,
2028.
(b) Fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2028, and
before July 1, 2043, to exceed the sum of $25,000,000. An amount
not to exceed 50 percent of the $25,000,000 per fiscal year for
which noninfrastructure transferable tax credits have not
previously been approved by the Office under an application for a
certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits submitted pursuant to NRS 360.759 may be carried
forward and made available for approval during the next or any
future fiscal year.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the
Office approves an application for a certificate of eligibility
pursuant to NRS 360.759, the Office shall assign the amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits identified under the
certificate of eligibility to the fiscal year in which the application
for the certificate of eligibility is approved.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, an amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the Office
-
*AB238_R1*

– 46 –
under a certificate of eligibility issued to a production company
pursuant to NRS 360.759 that exceeds the amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the Office
under a certificate of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
approved by the Office under a certificate of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits issued to the production company
pursuant NRS 360.759 may be added to the amount made
available for approval during subsequent fiscal years.
4. For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits before July 1, 2028, or
on or after July 1, 2043, the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits issued to any production company for any qualified
production pursuant to NRS 360.759:
(a) Must not exceed a total amount of $6,000,000; and
(b) Expire [4] at the end of the calendar year that is 6 years
after the date on which the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits are issued to the production company.
[3.] 5. For [the purposes of calculating qualified direct
production expenditures:
(a) The compensation payable to all producers who are Nevada
residents must not exceed 10 percent of the portion of the total
budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
(b) The compensation payable to all producers who are not
Nevada residents must not exceed 5 percent of the portion of the
total budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
(c) The compensation payable to any employee, independent
contractor or any other person paid a wage or salary as
compensation for providing labor services on the production of the
qualified production must not exceed $750,000.] an eligible
production company that submitted the application for the
certificate of eligibility for the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits on or after July 1, 2028, and before July 1, 2043, the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued to the production
company for a qualified production pursuant to NRS 360.759:
(a) Must not exceed a total of $7,000,000; and
(b) Expire at the end of the calendar year that is 6 years after
the date on which the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
are issued to the production company.
Sec. 24. NRS 360.7595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7595 1. [If the Office of Economic Development
receives an application for transferable tax credits pursuant to
-
*AB238_R1*

– 47 –
NRS 360.759, the Office shall, not later than 10 days before a
hearing on the application, provide notice of the hearing to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
2. The notice required by this section must set forth the date,
time and location of the hearing on the application. The date of the
hearing must be not later than 60 days after the Office receives the
completed application.
3. The Office shall issue a decision on the application not later
than 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing on the application.
4.] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if [the] an
application for a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits is approved [,] pursuant to NRS 360.759,
principal photography of the qualified production must begin not
more than 90 days after the date on which the decision on the
application is issued. The Office : [of Economic Development:]
(a) Shall prescribe by regulation the procedure for determining
the date of commencement of qualified productions that do not
include photography for the purposes of this section.
(b) May extend by not more than 90 days the period otherwise
prescribed by this subsection [.] , except that in the case of a force
majeure, the Office may extend the period for more than 90 days.
[5.] 2. A production company that produces a qualified
production shall submit the final assessment of the workforce plan,
the audit required by NRS 360.759 and all other required
information to the Office and the Department within the time
required by paragraph (c) or [(e)] (d) of subsection 3 of NRS
360.759 [.] , as applicable. Production of the qualified production
must be completed within 18 months after the date of
commencement of principal photography [.] , except that the Office
may extend this period for completion of the qualified production
by not more than 6 months. If the Office or the Department
determines that information submitted pursuant to this subsection is
incomplete, the production company shall, not later than 30 days
after receiving notice that the information is incomplete, provide to
the Office or the Department, as applicable, all additional
information required by the Office or the Department.
[6.] 3. The Office shall give priority to the approval and
processing of an application relating to a qualified production that
promotes tourism in the State of Nevada.
Sec. 25. NRS 360.7598 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7598 The Office of Economic Development shall, on or
before October 1 of each even-numbered year, prepare and submit
to the Governor and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
-
*AB238_R1*

– 48 –
Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature an annual report which
includes, for the immediately preceding fiscal year:
1. The number of applications submitted for a certificate of
eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to
NRS 360.759;
2. The number of qualified productions for which
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits were approved;
3. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
approved;
4. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
used;
5. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred;
6. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
taken against each allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount
used and outstanding, in total and for each qualified production;
7. The [total] aggregate amount of the qualified direct
production expenditures incurred by [each] qualified [production]
productions and the portion of those expenditures that were incurred
in Nevada;
8. The aggregate number of persons in Nevada employed by
[each] qualified [production and] productions, the aggregate
amount of wages paid to those persons [;] and aggregated
demographic information concerning those persons; [and]
9. The period during which each qualified production was in
Nevada and employed persons in Nevada [.] ; and
10. The compilation of information provided in reports made
by recipients of grants from the Account for Nevada Film, Media
and Related Technology Education and Vocational Training
created by section 31 of this act, which is provided to the Office
pursuant to section 33 of this act.
Sec. 26. Chapter 231 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 27 to 33, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 27. As used in sections 27 to 33, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 28, 29 and 30 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 28. “Account” means the Account for Nevada Film,
Media and Related Technology Education and Vocational
Training created by section 31 of this act.
Sec. 29. “Board” means the Board for Nevada Film, Media
and Related Technology Education and Vocational Training
created by section 32 of this act.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 49 –
Sec. 30. “Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio” has
the meaning ascribed to it in section 6 of this act.
Sec. 31. 1. The Account for Nevada Film, Media and
Related Technology Education and Vocational Training is hereby
created in the State General Fund. The Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development, at the direction of the Board,
shall administer the Account.
2. The Executive Director may apply for and accept gifts,
grants, bequests and donations from any source for deposit in the
Account.
3. The Account consists of:
(a) Money transferred to the Account pursuant to NRS
360.759 and section 10 of this act.
(b) Any direct legislative appropriations to the Account.
(c) Any gifts, grants, bequests and donations made to the
Account.
(d) Interest and income earned on money in the Account.
4. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the Account.
5. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of the
fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
6. Money in the Account must be used by the Office to make
grants to any institution within the Nevada System of Higher
Education, a state or local agency, a school district, a charter
school, a vocational trade school, a nonprofit organization, a labor
organization or a private postsecondary educational institution
that provides a program of workforce development for the
production of qualified productions in this State. Thirty percent of
the money which is distributed from the Account in the form of
grants must be allocated to the Nevada Partners Vocational
Training Studio for the operation and overhead costs of the
Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio. Seventy percent of
the money which is distributed from the Account in the form of
grants must be allocated to educational and vocational training
organizations pursuant to section 33 of this act for the purpose of
providing programs of workforce development for the production
of qualified productions in this State.
7. As used in this section, “qualified production” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 360.7586.
Sec. 32. 1. There is hereby created the Board for Nevada
Film, Media and Related Technology Education and Vocational
-
*AB238_R1*

– 50 –
Training within the Office of Economic Development in the Office
of the Governor, consisting of the following voting members:
(a) One member appointed by the Governor;
(b) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Majority Leader of the Senate;
(c) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Speaker of the Assembly;
(d) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Senate;
(e) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Assembly;
(f) Two members appointed by the Governor from nominees
selected by the lead participant in the Summerlin Production
Studios Project;
(g) One member appointed by the Governor from a nominee
selected by the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board to
represent the interests of the Nevada Partners Vocational Training
Studio;
(h) One member appointed by the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada;
(i) The President of the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, or
his or her designee; and
(j) The President of the University of Nevada, Reno, or his or
her designee.
2. In appointing members to the Board pursuant to
subsection 1, the appointing authorities set forth in that subsection
shall coordinate to ensure that both the public and private sectors
are represented on the Board.
3. The members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (a), (c),
(e) and (g) of subsection 1, and one member appointed pursuant to
paragraph (f) of subsection 1, must be appointed to an initial term
of 2 years commencing on January 1, 2028, and the members
appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b), (d) and (h) of subsection 1,
and one member appointed pursuant to paragraph (f) of
subsection 1, must be appointed to an initial term of 4 years
commencing on January 1, 2028. After the initial terms, each
appointed member shall serve a term of 4 years. Each appointed
member serves at the pleasure of the person appointing that
member pursuant to subsection 1. If, for any reason, a vacancy
occurs during the term of an appointed member, the person who is
responsible for making the appointment pursuant to subsection 1
shall appoint a replacement qualified pursuant to that subsection
to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. Each appointed
member may serve not more than three consecutive full terms.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 51 –
4. At the first meeting of each fiscal year, the Board shall
elect from among its members a Chair and a Vice Chair. The
Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development shall
serve as the nonvoting Secretary of the Board.
5. A majority of the voting members of the Board constitutes
a quorum, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting
members of the Board is required to exercise any power conferred
on the Board.
6. The Board shall meet at least twice each calendar year but
may meet more often at the call of the Chair or a majority of the
voting members of the Board.
7. The members of the Board serve without compensation but
are entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally while engaged
in the official business of the Board.
8. A member of the Board who is an officer or employee of
this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from duties without loss of regular compensation so that the
officer or employee may prepare for and attend meetings of the
Board and perform any work necessary to carry out the duties of
the Board in the most timely manner practicable. A state agency or
political subdivision of this State shall not require an officer or
employee who is a member of the Board to make up the time the
officer or employee is absent from work to carry out duties as a
member of the Board or use annual vacation or compensatory
time for the absence.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board” means
the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board created by
section 8 of the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community
Infrastructure Improvement Act.
(b) “Summerlin Production Studios Project” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 8 of this act.
Sec. 33. 1. The Board shall establish:
(a) The procedures for a person or entity to apply for a grant
of money from the Account;
(b) The criteria to be used to determine whether to approve an
application for a grant from the Account to an applicant; and
(c) The requirements for reports by recipients of grants from
the Account concerning the expenditures made from the grant, the
outcomes of the programs supported by the grant, demographic
data concerning the participants in the programs supported by the
grant and any other information deemed necessary by the Board.
The Board shall provide to the Office a compilation of the
-
*AB238_R1*

– 52 –
information provided in reports made by recipients pursuant to
this paragraph.
2. The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development may provide advice and recommendations regarding
the procedures, criteria and requirements established by the Board
pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The Office shall not make a grant of money from the
Account unless the Board has approved the application for the
grant.
4. A recipient of a grant must adopt and implement a
community benefits program, which must include, without
limitation:
(a) A commitment to workforce diversity, inclusiveness, access
and equality, including, without limitation, for underserved
communities, minority groups and veterans;
(b) An explanation of the actions that will be taken and
strategies that will be implemented to promote workforce diversity;
and
(c) The goals and performance measures which will be used to
measure the success of the program in achieving those goals.
Sec. 34. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 35. The Office of Economic Development, the Nevada
Gaming Commission and the Nevada Tax Commission shall each
adopt such regulations as are respectively required to implement the
provisions of this act on or before June 1, 2026.
Sec. 36. The Legislative Counsel shall:
1. In preparing the Nevada Revised Statutes, use the authority
set forth in subsection 10 of NRS 220.120 to substitute
appropriately the term “noninfrastructure transferable tax credits” in
NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive, for the term “transferable tax
credits” as previously used in those sections.
2. In preparing supplements to the Nevada Administrative
Code, substitute appropriately the term “noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits” in NAC 360.800 to 360.865, inclusive, for
the term “transferable tax credits” as previously used in those
sections.
Sec. 36.5. If any provision of this act, or the application
thereof to any person, thing or circumstance is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect the provisions or application of this act
which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to
be severable.
-
*AB238_R1*

– 53 –
Sec. 37. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval, and expires by limitation on June 30, 2049.
H
-
*AB238_R1*